District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Early Childhood Educator Pay Scales Congressional Review Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-16;
D.C. Official Code § 4-401 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 4-401) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “an expanded child
development home” and inserting the phrase “a child development home or an expanded child
development home” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (1D) is amended to read as follows:
“(1D) The term “CDA” means a child development associate credential
recognized by the Council for Professional Recognition and accepted by the Department to
demonstrate competency as a caregiver for young children or a state-awarded certificate that
meets or exceeds the requirements for a child development associate credential, as defined by the
Department.”.
(3) Paragraph (4B) is amended by striking the phrase “education.” and inserting
the phrase “education or a related field, as identified by the Department’s regulations governing
the qualifications of child development facility lead teachers and assistant teachers.” in its place.
(b) Section 11b (D.C. Official Code § 4-410.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) From October 1, 2024, through December 31, 2024, child development facilities that
enter or have entered into a contract or agreement with the Department to receive monies from
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund shall use such monies to pay, at minimum, the
salaries for assistant and lead teachers listed in tables 1 and 2 of this subsection:
Table 1: Assistant Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum salary
Less than a CDA $43,865/year
CDA $51,006/year
Associate $54,262/year
Table 2: Lead Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum salary
CDA or 48 credit hours with greater than $54,262/year
or equal to 15 credit hours in ECE
Associate in ECE or Associate with $63,838/year
greater than or equal to 24 credit hours
in ECE
Bachelor’s in ECE or Bachelor’s with $75,103/year
greater than or equal to 24 credit hours
in ECE
.”.
(2) New subsections (b-1) and (b-2) are added to read as follows:
“(b-1) Beginning January 1, 2025, child development facilities that enter or have entered
into a contract or agreement with the Department to receive monies from the Early Childhood
Educator Pay Equity Fund shall use such monies to pay, at minimum, the salaries for assistant
and lead teachers listed in tables 1 and 2 of this subsection:
Table 1: Assistant Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum Salary
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
CDA $51,006/year
($24.52/hour)
Associate degree or higher or 60 hours of college-level $54,262/year
coursework in any field ($26.09/hour)
Table 2: Lead Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum Salary
Child development center teacher or expanded child development $51,006/year
home caregiver with a CDA ($24.52/hour)
Child development home caregiver with a CDA $54,262/year
($26.09/hour)
Associate in ECE; associate with at least 12 credit hours in ECE; $63,838/year
60 college credit hours with at least 12 credit hours in ECE ($30.69/hour)
Bachelor’s or higher in ECE; or Bachelor’s with at least 12 credit $75,103/year
hours in ECE ($36.11/hour)
“(b-2) The Department shall issue guidance to assist child development facilities with
aligning the minimum salary requirements in subsections (b) and (b-1) of this section with the
qualifications for child development facility assistant and lead teachers it has established by
regulation.”.
(3) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “Tables 1 and 2 to” and
inserting the phrase “tables 1 and 2 in subsection (b-1) of this section to” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4